Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1356.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1703-H(b)(5)(ii) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1703-H. Tax credit certificates.* * *(b) Review, recommendation and approval.--* * *(5) In granting tax credit certificates under this article, the Department of Community and Economic Development:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(ii) Shall not grant more than [$500,000] $1,500,000 in tax credit certificates to a single qualified taxpayer in any fiscal year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1356PN1772 - 2 - 123456